District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-108.07

Settlement of accounts and contributions among partners.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 807, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720

History

1981 Ed., § 41-158.7.

Prior Codifications